vi: Xử lý thuốc trừ sâu: Tẩm Durallin; Xử lý bằng EX8; Insect Shield; Xử lý bằng Permethrin; Chưa xử lý; Khác
el: Επεξεργασία με εντομοκτόνο: Εμποτισμένο με Durallin; Επεξεργασμένο με EX8; Insect Shield; Επεξεργασμένο με περμεθρίνη; Χωρίς επεξεργασία; Άλλο
da: Insekticidbehandling: Durallin-imprægneret; EX8-behandlet; Insect Shield; Permethrin-behandlet; Ubehandlet; Andet
tr: Böcek ilacı uygulaması: Durallin emdirilmiş; EX8 uygulamalı; Insect Shield; Permetrin uygulamalı; İşlem görmemiş; Diğer
ru: Инсектицидная обработка: Пропитано Durallin; Обработано EX8; Insect Shield; Обработано перметрином; Без обработки; Другое
cs: Insekticidní ošetření: Impregnace Durallin; Ošetřeno EX8; Insect Shield; Ošetřeno permethrinem; Neošetřeno; Jiné
pt-PT: Tratamento de inseticida: Impregnado com Durallin; Tratado com EX8; Insect Shield; Tratado com permetrina; Não tratado; Outro
fi: Hyönteisten torjunta: Durallin-kyllästetty; EX8-käsitelty; Insect Shield; Permetriinikäsitelty; Käsittelemätön; Muu
ja: 殺虫剤処理: デュラリン含浸; EX8加工; インセクトシールド; ペルメトリン加工; 未加工; その他
ko: 살충제 처리: 듀랄린 침투; EX8 처리; 인섹트 실드; 퍼메트린 처리; 무처리; 기타
ro-RO: Tratament insecticid: Impregnat cu Durallin; Tratat cu EX8; Insect Shield; Tratat cu permetrină; Netratat; Altele
de: Insektizidbehandlung: Durallin-imprägniert; EX8-behandelt; Insect Shield; Permethrin-behandelt; Unbehandelt; Sonstige
sl-SI: Obdelava z insekticidom: Impregnirano z Durallinom; Tretirano z EX8; Insect Shield; Tretirano s permetrinom; Netretirano; Drugo
th: การเคลือบสารฆ่าแมลง: ชุบ Durallin; เคลือบ EX8; ป้องกันแมลง (Insect Shield); เคลือบ Permethrin; ไม่ผ่านการเคลือบ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 殺蟲劑處理: 浸透 Durallin (防蚊處理); EX8 處理; 防蟲網; 氯菊酯處理; 未處理; 其他
hr-HR: Tretman insekticidom: Impregnirano Durallinom; Tretirano tehnologijom EX8; Insect Shield; Tretirano permetrinom; Netretirano; Ostalo
sv: Insektsmedelsbehandling: Durallin-impregnerad; EX8-behandlad; Insect Shield; Permetrinbehandlad; Obehandlad; Övrigt
nb: Insektsmiddelbehandling: Durallin-impregnert; EX8-behandlet; Insect Shield; Permetrinbehandlet; Ubehandlet; Annet
hu: Rovarirtó kezelés: Durallinnal impregnált; EX8-cal kezelt; Insect Shield; Permetrinnel kezelt; Kezeletlen; Egyéb
sk-SK: Ošetrenie insekticídmi: Impregnované látkou Durallin; Ošetrené látkou EX8; Insect Shield; Ošetrené permetrínom; Neošetrené; Iné
zh-CN: 防虫处理: Durallin 浸渍处理; EX8 处理; Insect Shield; 氯菊酯处理; 未处理; 其他
it: Trattamento con insetticida: Impregnato di Durallin; Trattato con EX8; Insect Shield; Trattato con permetrina; Non trattato; Altro
pt-BR: Tratamento com inseticida: Impregnado com Durallin; Tratado com EX8; Proteção contra insetos; Tratado com permetrina; Sem tratamento; Outro
nl: Insecticide behandeling: Geïmpregneerd met Durallin; Behandeld met EX8; Insect Shield; Behandeld met permethrine; Onbehandeld; Overige
bg-BG: Третиране с инсектицид: Импрегнирано с Durallin; Третирано с EX8; Insect Shield; Третирано с перметрин; Нетретирано; Други
es: Variación de insecticida: Impregnado con Durallin; Tratado con EX8; Protección contra insectos (Insect Shield); Tratado con permetrina; Sin tratamiento; Otro
en: Insecticide treatment: Durallin impregnated; EX8 treated; Insect Shield; Permethrin treated; Untreated; Other
pl: Obróbka insektycydowa: Impregnowane Durallin; Z powłoką EX8; Insect Shield; Z powłoką z permetryną; Bez powłoki; Inne
lt-LT: Insekticidinis apdorojimas: Impregnuota „Durallin“; Apdorota EX8; „Insect Shield“; Apdorota permetrinu; Neapdorota; Kita
fr: Traitement insecticide: Imprégné de Durallin; Traité au EX8; Insect Shield; Traité à la perméthrine; Non traité; Autre